Arkansas, session 2025, HB1083.
BE IT ENACTED BY THE GENERAL ASSEMBLY OF THE STATE OF ARKANSAS:

SECTION 1. Arkansas Code Title 4, Chapter 88, is amended to add an
additional subchapter to read as follows:
Subchapter 15 — Arkansas Kids Online Safety Act

4-88-1501. Title.
This subchapter shall be known and may be cited as the "Arkansas Kids
Online Safety Act".

4-88-1502. Definitions.
As used in this subchapter:
(1) "Child" means an individual who is twelve (12) years of age
or less;
(2) "Compulsive usage" means any response stimulated by external
factors that causes an individual to engage in repetitive behavior that is
reasonably likely to cause psychological distress, loss of control, anxiety,
or depression;
(3) "Connected device” means an electronic device that:
(A) Is capable of connecting to the internet, either
*LJH015*
02-27-2025 11:33:31 LJH015

As Engrossed: H1/23/25 H1/30/25 H2/10/25 H2/12/25 H2/26/25 H2/27/25 HB1083
directly or indirectly through a network, to communicate information at the
direction of an individual;
(B) Has computer processing capabilities for collecting,
sending, receiving, or analyzing data; and
(C) Is primarily designed for or marketed to consumers;
(4)(A) "Covered platform" means an entity that operates an
online platform, messaging application, or video streaming service that:
(i) Connects to the internet; and
(ii) Is targeted to minors
(B) "Covered platform" does not include:
(i) An entity acting in the entity's own capacity as
a provider of:
(a) A common carrier service subject to the
Telecommunications Act of 1996, Pub. L. No. 73-416;
(b) A broadband internet access service as
defined in 47 C.F.R. § 8.1(b), as it existed on January 1, 2025;
(c) An email service;
(d) A teleconferencing or videoconferencing
service that allows reception and transmission of audio and video signals for
real-time communication, provided that:
(1) It is not an online platform such as
a social media service or social network; and
(2) The real-time communication is
initiated by using a unique link or identifier to facilitate access; or
(e) A wireless messaging service, including a
service that is provided through short messaging service or multimedia
messaging service protocols:
(1) That is not a component of or linked
to an online platform; and
(2) Where the predominant or exclusive
function is direct messaging consisting of the transmission of text, photos,
or videos that are sent by electronic means, where messages are transmitted
from the sender to the recipient, and are not posted within an online
platform or publicly;
(ii) An organization that is not organized to carry
on business for its own profit or the profit of its members;
02-27-2025 11:33:31 LJH015

As Engrossed: H1/23/25 H1/30/25 H2/10/25 H2/12/25 H2/26/25 H2/27/25 HB1083
(iii) A public or private preschool, elementary
school, secondary school, or any institution of vocational, professional, or
higher education;
(iv) A library, as defined in the Library Services
and Technology Act, 20 U.S.C. § 9122, as it existed on January 1, 2025;
(v) A news website or news application where:
(a) The inclusion of video content on the
website or application is related to the website or application's own
gathering, reporting, or publishing of news content; and
(b) The website or application is not
otherwise an online platform;
(vi) A product or service that primarily functions
as business-to-business software;
(vii) A virtual private network or similar service
that exists solely to route internet traffic between locations; or
(viii) An interactive gaming platform that complies
with the requirements of the Children's Online Privacy Protection Act, 15
U.S.C. § 6501, and the regulations, rules, guidance, and exemptions under
that act, as it existed on January 1, 2025;
(5) "Deidentified" means data that does not identify and is not linked
or reasonably linkable to a device that is linked or reasonably linkable to
an individual, regardless of whether the information is aggregated;
(6) "Geolocation" means information sufficient to identify a
street name and a name of a city or town;
(7)(A) "Individual-specific advertising to minors" means
advertising or any other effort to market a product or service that is
directed to a specific minor or a device that is linked or reasonably
linkable to a minor based on:
(i) The personal data of the minor or a group of
minors who are similar in sex, age, income level, race, or ethnicity to the
specific minor to whom the product or service is marketed;
(ii) Psychological profiling of a minor or group of
minors; or
(iii) A unique identifier of the device.
(B) "Individual-specific advertising to minors" includes
advertising or any other effort to market a product or service that is
02-27-2025 11:33:31 LJH015

As Engrossed: H1/23/25 H1/30/25 H2/10/25 H2/12/25 H2/26/25 H2/27/25 HB1083
directed to a specific minor or a device that is linked or reasonably
linkable to a minor as a result of use by the minor, access by device of the
minor, or use by a group of minors who are similar to the specific minor, of
more than a single:
(i) Website;
(ii) Online service;
(iii) Online application;
(iv) Mobile application; or
(v) Connected device.
(C) "Individual-specific advertising to minors" does not
include:
(i) Advertising or marketing to a minor or the
device of the minor's specific request for information or feedback, including
without limitation a minor's current search query;
(ii) Contextual advertising, including without
limitation when an advertisement is displayed based on the content of the
covered platform on which the advertisement appears and does not vary based
on personal information related to the minor; or
(iii) Processing personal information solely for
measuring or reporting advertising or content performance, reach, or
frequency, including without limitation independent measurement;
(8) "Knows" means to have actual knowledge or knowledge fairly
implied on the basis of objective circumstances;
(9) "Mental health disorder" means the same as "mental disorder"
under the most current edition of the Diagnostic and Statistical Manual of
Mental Disorders;
(10) "Minor" means an individual who is sixteen (16) years of
age or younger;
(11) "Narcotic drugs" means the same as defined in the
Controlled Substances Act, 21 U.S.C. § 802, as it existed on January 1, 2025;
(12)(A) "Online platform" means any public-facing website,
online service, online application, or mobile application created primarily
to serve a community forum for user generated content, including without
limitation sharing videos, images, audio files, or other content.
(B) "Online platform" does not include:
(i) An entity that solely provides access to third-
02-27-2025 11:33:31 LJH015

As Engrossed: H1/23/25 H1/30/25 H2/10/25 H2/12/25 H2/26/25 H2/27/25 HB1083
party applications through a website, online service, online application, or
mobile application without exercising control over the functionality,
content, or user interactions within those applications;
(ii) A broadband internet service; or
(iii) A telecommunications service, as defined in 47
U.S.C. § 153, as it existed on January 1, 2025;
(13) "Parent" means a:
(A) Natural parent of a minor;
(B) Legal guardian of a minor; or
(C) Individual with legal custody of a minor;
(14) "Personal data" means information that identifies or is
linked or reasonably linkable to a particular minor, including without
limitation a consumer device identifier that is linked or reasonably linkable
to a minor;
(15) "Personalized recommendation system" means a fully or
partially automated system used to suggest, promote, or rank content,
including other users or posts, based on the personal data of a user or
users;
(16) "Verifiable parental consent" means the same as defined in
the Children's Online Privacy Protection Act, 15 United States Code § 6501,
as it existed on January 1, 2025; and
(17) “Video streaming service” means a digital platform that
enables users to upload, share, or view user-generated video content in real
time.

4-88-1503. Duty of care — Prevention of harm to minors — Limitations.
(a) A covered platform shall take reasonable measures in the design
and operation of any product, service, or feature that the covered platform
knows is used by minors to avoid any heightened risk of harm to minors caused
by such product, service, or feature, including without limitation:
(1) The following mental health disorders, consistent with
evidence-informed medical information:
(A) Anxiety;
(B) Depression;
(C) Eating disorders;
(D) Substance use disorders; and
02-27-2025 11:33:31 LJH015

As Engrossed: H1/23/25 H1/30/25 H2/10/25 H2/12/25 H2/26/25 H2/27/25 HB1083
(E) Suicidal behaviors;
(2) Patterns of use that indicate or encourage addiction-like
behaviors;
(3) Physical violence, online bullying, and harassment of the
minor;
(4) Sexual exploitation and abuse;
(5) Promotion and marketing of narcotic drugs, tobacco products,
gambling, or alcohol; and
(6) Predatory, unfair, or deceptive marketing practices and
other financial harms.
(b) This section shall not be construed to require a covered platform
to prevent or preclude:
(1) A minor from deliberately and independently searching for or
specifically requesting content;
(2) The covered platform or individuals on the platform from
providing resources for the prevention or mitigation of the harms described
in subsection (a) of this section; or
(3) A covered platform that knows that an individual is a minor
from delivering an advertisement that is age-appropriate for the minor
involved and intended for a minor, so long as the covered platform does not
use any personal data other than the age of the minor in deciding to deliver
the advertisement.

4-88-1504. Safeguards for minors — Parental tools — Reporting —
Application.
(a) A covered platform shall provide an individual that the covered
platform knows is a minor with readily accessible and easy-to-use safeguards
to:
(1) Limit the ability of other individuals to communicate with
the minor;
(2) Prevent other users, whether registered or not, from viewing
the minor's personal data collected by or shared on the covered platform,
including without limitation restricting public access to personal data;
(3) Limit features that increase, sustain, or extend use of the
covered platform by the minor, including without limitation:
(A) Automatic playing of media;
02-27-2025 11:33:31 LJH015

As Engrossed: H1/23/25 H1/30/25 H2/10/25 H2/12/25 H2/26/25 H2/27/25 HB1083
(B) Rewards for time spent on the platform;
(C) Notifications; and
(D) Other features that result in compulsive usage of the
covered platform by the minor;
(4) Control personalized recommendation systems by providing the
minor with the ability to:
(A) Opt out of personalized recommendation systems while
still allowing the display of content based on a chronological format; or
(B) Limit access to certain types or categories of
recommendations from the personalized recommendation systems;
(5) Restrict the sharing of the geolocation of the minor to
other users on the platform; and
(6) Provide notice regarding the tracking of the minor's
geolocation.
(b) A covered platform shall provide an individual that the covered
platform knows is a minor with readily accessible and easy-to-use options to:
(1) Delete the minor's account and any personal data collected
from or shared by the minor on the covered platform; or
(2) Limit the amount of time spent by the minor on the covered
platform.
(c) A covered platform shall provide that, in the case of a user that
the platform knows is a minor, the default setting for any safeguard
described under subsection (a) of this section shall be the option available
on the platform that provides the most protective level of control that is
offered by the platform over privacy and safety for that user.
(d)(1) A covered platform shall provide readily accessible and easy-
to-use settings for a parent to support an individual that the covered
platform knows is a minor with respect to the individual's use of the covered
platform.
(2) The parental tools provided by a covered platform shall
include:
(A) The ability to manage a minor's privacy and account
settings, including without limitation the safeguards and options established
under subsections (a) and (b) of this section, in a manner that allows a
parent to:
(i) View the privacy and account settings; and
02-27-2025 11:33:31 LJH015

As Engrossed: H1/23/25 H1/30/25 H2/10/25 H2/12/25 H2/26/25 H2/27/25 HB1083
(ii) In the case of a user that the covered platform
knows is a child, change and control the privacy and account settings; and
(B) The ability to:
(i) Restrict purchases and financial transactions by
the minor; and
(ii) View metrics of total time spent on the
platform and restrict time spent on the covered platform by the minor.
(3) A covered platform shall provide clear and conspicuous
notice to an individual that the platform knows is a minor when the tools
under subdivisions (1)—(3) of this subsection (d) are in use and what
settings or controls have been applied.
(4) If a covered platform knows a user is a child, the covered
platform shall ensure that the tools described under subdivisions (1)—(3) of
this subsection (d) are enabled by default.
(e)(1) A covered platform shall provide:
(A) A readily accessible and easy-to-use means to submit
reports to the covered platform of harms to a minor;
(B) An electronic point of contact specific to matters
involving harms to a minor; and
(C) Confirmation of the covered platform's receipt of such
a report and a means to track a submitted report through the covered
platform.
(2)(A) A covered platform shall establish an internal process to
receive and substantively respond to such reports in a reasonable and timely
manner, but in no case later than:
(i) Ten (10) days after receipt of a report, if for
the most recent calendar year, the covered platform averaged more than ten
million (10,000,000) active users on a monthly basis in the United States; or
(ii) Twenty-one (21) days after receipt of a report,
if for the most recent calendar year, the covered platform averaged fewer
than ten million (10,000,000) active users on a monthly basis in the United
States.
(B) However, if the report under this subsection (e)
involves an imminent threat to the safety of a minor, a covered platform
shall address as promptly as possible the reported threat to safety.
(f) If a covered platform knows an individual is a minor, the covered
02-27-2025 11:33:31 LJH015

As Engrossed: H1/23/25 H1/30/25 H2/10/25 H2/12/25 H2/26/25 H2/27/25 HB1083
platform shall not facilitate advertising to the minor of:
(1) Narcotic drugs;
(2) Tobacco products;
(3) Gambling; or
(4) Alcohol.
(g) A covered platform shall implement the safeguards and parental
controls described under subsections (a)—(d) of this section by providing:
(1) Information and control options in a clear and conspicuous
manner that:
(A) Considers the differing ages, capacities, and
developmental needs of the minors most likely to access the covered platform;
and
(B) Does not encourage a minor or a parent of a minor
to weaken or disable safeguards or parental controls;
(2) Readily accessible and easy-to-use controls to enable or
disable safeguards or parental controls; and
(3) Information and control options in the same language, form,
and manner as the covered platform provides the product or service used by
minors and their parents.
(h) It is unlawful and a violation of the Deceptive Trade Practices
Act, § 4-88-101 et seq., for any covered platform to design, modify, or
manipulate a user interface of a covered platform with the purpose or
substantial effect of subverting or impairing user autonomy, decision-making,
or choice regarding safeguards or parental controls required under this
section.
(i) Nothing in this section shall be construed to:
(1) Prevent a covered platform from taking reasonable measures
to:
(A) Block, detect, or prevent the distribution of
unlawful, obscene, or other harms to minors as described in § 4-88-1503; or
(B) Block or filter spam, prevent criminal activity, or
protect the security of a covered platform;
(2) Require the disclosure of a minor's browsing behavior,
search history, messages, contact list, or other content or metadata of his
or her communications;
(3) Prevent a covered platform from using a personalized
02-27-2025 11:33:31 LJH015

As Engrossed: H1/23/25 H1/30/25 H2/10/25 H2/12/25 H2/26/25 H2/27/25 HB1083
recommendation system to display content to a minor if the personalized
recommendation system only uses information on:
(A) The language spoken by the minor;
(B) The city the minor is located in; or
(C) The minor's age; or
(4) Prohibit a covered platform from integrating its products or
service with controls from third-party systems, including without limitation
operating systems or gaming consoles, to meet the requirements imposed under
subsections (a)—(d) of this section regarding safeguards for minors and tools
for parents, provided that:
(A) The controls meet the requirements under subsections
(a)—(d) of this section; and
(B) The minor or parent is provided with reasonable notice
under the circumstances of the integration and use of the controls.

4-88-1505. Disclosure — Notice — Personalized recommendation system —
Advertising and marketing information and labels — Resources.
(a)(1) Before registration or purchase of a covered platform by an
individual that the platform knows is a minor, the covered platform shall
provide clear, conspicuous, and easy-to-understand:
(A) Notice of the policies and practices of the covered
platform regarding personal data and safeguards for minors;
(B) Information about how to access the safeguards and
parental tools required under § 4-88-1504; and
(C) Notice regarding whether the covered platform uses or
makes available to minors a product, service, or feature, including without
limitation a personalized recommendation system, that poses any heightened
risk of harm to minors.
(2)(A) In the case of an individual that a covered platform
knows is a child, the platform shall provide information about the parental
tools and safeguards required under § 4-88-1504 to a parent of the child and
obtain verifiable parental consent from the parent before the initial use of
the covered platform by the child.
(B) A covered platform is deemed to have satisfied the
requirement described in subdivision (a)(2)(A) if the covered platform uses
reasonable efforts taking into consideration available technology to provide
02-27-2025 11:33:31 LJH015

As Engrossed: H1/23/25 H1/30/25 H2/10/25 H2/12/25 H2/26/25 H2/27/25 HB1083
a parent with the information described in subdivision (a)(2)(A) of this
section and to obtain verifiable parental consent under § 4-88-1504.
(C) If the covered platform is not required to obtain
verifiable parental consent under § 4-88-1504, the covered platform shall
provide information about the parental tools and safeguards required under §
4-88-1504 to a parent of a user that the platform knows is a child and obtain
parental consent from the parent before the initial use of the covered
platform by the child.
(b) A covered platform that operates a personalized recommendation
system shall, in a clear, conspicuous, and easy-to-understand manner, set out
in its terms and conditions of use:
(1) An overview of how the personalized recommendation system is
used by the covered platform to provide information to the users of the
platform who are minors, including without limitation how the personalized
recommendation system uses the personal data of minors; and
(2) Information about options for a minor or his or her parent
to opt out of or control the personalized recommendation system.
(c) A covered platform that facilitates advertising aimed at a user
that the covered platform knows is a minor shall provide clear, conspicuous,
and easy-to-understand information and labels to the minor on advertisements
regarding:
(1) The name of the product, service, or brand and the subject
matter of an advertisement;
(2) If the covered platform engages in individual-specific
advertising to minors, why a particular advertisement is directed to a
specific minor, including without limitation material information about how
the minor's personal data is used to direct the advertisement to the minor;
and
(3) Whether particular media displayed to the minor is an
advertisement or marketing material, including without limitation disclosure
of endorsements of products, services, or brands made for commercial
consideration by other users of the covered platform.
(d) A covered platform shall provide to a minor and his or her parent
clear, conspicuous, easy-to-understand, and comprehensive information in a
prominent location regarding:
(1) The covered platform's policies and practices regarding
02-27-2025 11:33:31 LJH015

As Engrossed: H1/23/25 H1/30/25 H2/10/25 H2/12/25 H2/26/25 H2/27/25 HB1083
collection and retention of personal data and safeguards in place to protect
minors; and
(2) How to access the safeguards and tools required under § 4-
88-1504.
(e) A covered platform shall ensure, to the extent practicable, that
the disclosures required by this section are made available in the same
language, form, and manner as the covered platform provides any product or
service used by a minor and his or her parent.

4-88-1506. Enforcement.
(a) In an enforcement action brought under this subchapter, the
Attorney General shall allege a violation of a provision of this subchapter.
(b)(1) A violation of this subchapter is:
(A) An unfair and deceptive act or practice under the
Deceptive Trade Practices Act, § 4-88-101 et seq.; and
(B) Punishable solely by action of the Attorney General.
(2) All remedies, penalties, and authority granted to the
Attorney General under the Deceptive Trade Practices Act, § 4-88-101 et seq.,
shall be available to the Attorney General for the enforcement of this
subchapter.
(3) The remedies and penalties for violations under this
subchapter are cumulative and in addition to other procedures or remedies for
violations or conduct under other law.

4-88-1507. Kids Online Safety Council.
(a) There is created within the Department of Commerce a council to be
known as the "Kids Online Safety Council".
(b) The council shall consist of nine (9) members appointed by the
Secretary of Commerce and include diverse participation from:
(1) Academic experts, health professionals, and members of civil
society with expertise in mental health, substance use disorders, and the
prevention of harms to minors;
(2) Representatives in academia and civil society with specific
expertise in privacy and civil liberties;
(3) Parents and youth representation;
(4) Representatives of covered platforms;
02-27-2025 11:33:31 LJH015

As Engrossed: H1/23/25 H1/30/25 H2/10/25 H2/12/25 H2/26/25 H2/27/25 HB1083
(5) Representatives of the State Securities Department, the
Department of Corrections, the Department of Health, and the Department of
Human Services;
(6) Educators; and
(7) Representatives of communities of socially disadvantaged
individuals as defined in the Small Business Act, 15 U.S.C. § 631 et seq., as
it existed on January 1, 2025.
(c) The council shall:
(1) Identify emerging or current risks of harms to minors
associated with online platforms;
(2) Recommend measures and methods for assessing, preventing,
and mitigating harms to minors online;
(3) Recommend methods and themes for conducting research
regarding online harms to minors, including in English and languages other
than English; and
(4) Recommend best practices and clear, consensus-based
technical standards for transparency reports and audits, as required under
this subchapter, including methods, criteria, and scope to promote overall
accountability.

4-88-1508. Filter bubble transparency requirements — Definitions.
(a) As used in this section:
(1) "Algorithmic ranking system” means a computational process,
including without limitation a computational process derived from algorithmic
decision-making, machine learning, statistical analysis, or other data
processing or artificial intelligence techniques, used to determine the
selection, order, relative prioritization, or relative prominence of content
from a set of information that is provided to a user on a covered platform,
including without limitation the:
(A) Ranking of search results;
(B) Provision of content recommendations;
(C) Display of social media posts; or
(D) Any other method of automated content selection;
(2) "Downstream provider” means, with respect to a search
syndication contract, the person that receives access to an index of web
pages on the internet from an upstream provider under such contract;
02-27-2025 11:33:31 LJH015

As Engrossed: H1/23/25 H1/30/25 H2/10/25 H2/12/25 H2/26/25 H2/27/25 HB1083
(3)(A) "Input-transparent algorithm” means an algorithmic
ranking system that does not use the user-specific data of a user to
determine the selection, order, relative prioritization, or relative
prominence of information that is furnished to such user on a covered
platform, unless the user-specific data is expressly provided to the covered
platform by the user for that purpose.
(B) For purposes of subdivision (a)(3)(A) of this section,
user-specific data that is provided by a user for the express purpose of
determining the selection, order, relative prioritization, or relative
prominence of information that is furnished to such user on a covered
platform:
(i) Shall include user-supplied search terms,
filters, speech patterns, if provided for the purpose of enabling the
platform to accept spoken input or selecting the language in which the user
interacts with the platform, saved preferences, and the current precise
geolocation information that is supplied by the user;
(ii) Shall include the user's current approximate
geolocation information;
(iii) Shall include data affirmatively supplied to
the covered platform by the user that expresses the user's desire to receive
particular information, such as the social media profiles the user follows,
the video channels the user subscribes to, or other content or sources of
content on the platform the user has selected;
(iv) Shall not include the history of the user's
connected device, including the user's history of web searches and browsing,
previous geographical locations, physical activity, device interaction, and
financial transactions; and
(v) Shall not include inferences about the user or
the user's connected device, without regard to whether such inferences are
based on data described in subdivision (a)(4)(B)(i) or subdivision
(a)(4)(B)(ii) of this section;
(4)(A) "Opaque algorithm” means an algorithmic ranking system
that determines the selection, order, relative prioritization, or relative
prominence of information that is furnished to the user on a covered platform
based, in whole or part, on user-specific data that was not expressly
provided by the user to the platform for such purpose.
02-27-2025 11:33:31 LJH015

As Engrossed: H1/23/25 H1/30/25 H2/10/25 H2/12/25 H2/26/25 H2/27/25 HB1083
(B) "Opaque algorithm" does not include an algorithmic
ranking system used by a covered platform if:
(i) The only user-specific data, including without
limitation inferences about the user, that algorithmic ranking system uses is
information relating to the age of the user; and
(ii) The information is only used to restrict a
user's access to content on the basis that the individual is a minor;

(5) "Search syndication contract” means a contract or
subcontract for the sale of, license of, or other right to access an index of
web pages or search results on the internet for the purpose of operating an
internet search engine;
(6) "Upstream provider” means, with respect to a search
syndication contract, the person that grants access to an index of web pages
or search results on the internet to a downstream provider under the
contract; and
(7) "User-specific data” means information relating to an
individual or a specific connected device that would not necessarily be true
of every individual or device.
(b)(1) Beginning on the date that is one (1) year after the date of
enactment of this subchapter, it shall be unlawful:
(A) For any person to operate a covered platform that uses
an opaque algorithm unless the person complies with the requirements of
subdivision (b)(2) of this section; or
(B) For any upstream provider to grant access to an index
of web pages on the internet under a search syndication contract that does
not comply with the requirements of subdivision (b)(3) of this section.
(2)(A) A covered platform operating an opaque algorithm shall:
(i) Provide notice to users of the platform:
(a) That the covered platform uses an opaque
algorithm that uses user-specific data to select the content the user sees,
with such notice presented in a clear, conspicuous manner on the covered
platform whenever the user interacts with an opaque algorithm for the first
time that can be dismissed by the user; and
(b) In the terms and conditions of the covered
platform, in a clear, accessible, and easily comprehensible manner to be
02-27-2025 11:33:31 LJH015

As Engrossed: H1/23/25 H1/30/25 H2/10/25 H2/12/25 H2/26/25 H2/27/25 HB1083
updated no less frequently than once every six (6) months:
(1) The most important features, inputs,
and parameters used by the algorithm;
(2) How any user-specific data used by
the algorithm is collected or inferred about a user of the covered platform,
and the categories of such data;
(3) Any options that the covered
internet platform makes available for a user of the platform to opt out or
exercise options under subsection (b)(2)(A)(ii) of this section, modify the
profile of the user, or influence the features, inputs, or parameters used by
the algorithm; and
(4) Any quantities, such as time spent
using a product or specific measures of engagement or social interaction,
that the algorithm is designed to optimize, as well as a general description
of the relative importance of each quantity for such ranking; and
(ii) Make available a version of the platform that
uses an input-transparent algorithm and enables users to easily switch
between the version of the platform that uses an opaque algorithm and the
version of the platform that uses the input-transparent algorithm.
(B) Subdivision (b)(2)(A) of this section shall not apply
with respect to an internet search engine if:
(i) The search engine is operated by a downstream
provider with fewer than one thousand (1,000) employees; and
(ii) The search engine uses an index of web pages on
the internet to which such provider received access under a search
syndication contract.
(3) An upstream provider engaged in a search syndication
contract shall:
(A) Make the upstream provider makes available to the
downstream provider the same input-transparent algorithm used by the upstream
provider for purposes of complying with subdivision (b)(2)(A)(ii) of this
section; and
(B) Not impose any additional costs, degraded quality,
reduced speed, or other constraint on the functioning of the algorithm when
used by the downstream provider to operate an internet search engine relative
to the performance of the algorithm when used by the upstream provider to
02-27-2025 11:33:31 LJH015

As Engrossed: H1/23/25 H1/30/25 H2/10/25 H2/12/25 H2/26/25 H2/27/25 HB1083
operate an internet search engine.
(4) A covered platform shall not deny, charge different prices
or rates for, or condition the provision of a service or product to an
individual based on the individual’s election to use a version of the
platform that uses an input-transparent algorithm as provided under
subdivision (b)(2)(A)(ii) of this section.
(c) A violation of this section by an operator of a covered platform
shall be treated as an unfair or deceptive act or practice under the
Deceptive Trade Practices Act, § 4-88-101 et seq.
(d) Nothing in this section shall be construed to limit or prohibit a
covered platform’s ability to, at the direction of an individual user or
group of users, restrict another user from searching for, finding, accessing,
or interacting with such user’s or group’s account, content, data, or online
community.

4-88-1509. Construction.
(a) For purposes of enforcing this subchapter, in making a
determination as to whether a covered platform has knowledge fairly implied
on the basis of objective circumstances that a user is a minor, the Attorney
General shall rely on competent and reliable empirical evidence, taking into
account the totality of the circumstances, including without limitation
consideration of whether the operator, using available technology, exercised
reasonable care.
(b) Nothing in this subchapter shall be construed to require:
(1) The affirmative collection of any personal data with respect
to the age of users that a covered platform is not already collecting in the
normal course of business; or
(2) A covered platform to implement an age gating or age
verification functionality.
(c) Nothing in this subchapter shall be construed to restrict a
covered platform's ability to:
(1) Cooperate with law enforcement agencies regarding activity
that the covered platform reasonably and in good faith believes may violate
federal law, state law, or local regulations;
(2) Comply with a civil, criminal, or regulatory inquiry or any
investigation, subpoena, or summons by federal, state, local, or other
02-27-2025 11:33:31 LJH015

As Engrossed: H1/23/25 H1/30/25 H2/10/25 H2/12/25 H2/26/25 H2/27/25 HB1083
government authorities; or
(3) Investigate, establish, exercise, respond to, or defend
against legal claims.
(d) A video streaming service is in compliance with this subchapter
if:
(1) It predominantly consists of news, sports, entertainment, or
other video programming content that is preselected by the provider and not
user-generated;
(2) Any chat, comment, or interactive functionality that the
video streaming service provides is incidental to, directly related to, or
dependent on provision of that content; and
(3) If the video streaming service requires account owner
registration and is not predominantly news or sports, the service includes
the capability:
(A) To limit a minor’s access to the service, including
without limitation utilizing a system of age-rating;
(B) To limit the automatic playing of on-demand content
selected by a personalized recommendation system for an individual that the
service knows is a minor;
(C) To provide an individual that the service knows is a
minor with readily accessible and easy-to-use options to delete an account
held by the minor and delete any personal data collected from the minor on
the service, or, in the case of a service that allows a parent to create a
profile for a minor, to allow a parent to delete the minor’s profile, and to
delete any personal data collected from the minor on the service;
(D) For a parent to manage a minor’s privacy and account
settings, and restrict purchases and financial transactions by a minor;
(E) To provide an electronic point of contact specific to
matters described in subdivision (c)(3) of this section;
(F) To offer a clear, conspicuous, and easy-to-understand
notice of the covered platform's policies and practices with respect to
personal data and the capabilities described in this subdivision (c)(3) of
this section; and
(G) When providing on-demand content, to employ measures
that safeguard against serving advertising for narcotic drugs, tobacco
products, gambling, or alcohol directly to the account or profile of an
02-27-2025 11:33:31 LJH015

As Engrossed: H1/23/25 H1/30/25 H2/10/25 H2/12/25 H2/26/25 H2/27/25 HB1083
individual that the service knows is a minor.

SECTION 2. DO NOT CODIFY. EFFECTIVE DATE.
This act is effective on and after July 1, 2026.

/s/Gramlich






























02-27-2025 11:33:31 LJH015